Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5247SV (2) 91 je/ns S.F. 2303 Section 1. REVIEW OF UNDERGRADUATE GENERAL EDUCATION 1 REQUIREMENTS AND CORE CURRICULA. By the semester beginning 2 fall 2028, the state board of regents shall conduct a review 3 of all undergraduate general education requirements and 4 core curricula at institutions of higher education governed 5 by the board. For the review, the board shall direct the 6 institutions to review and identify any required courses or 7 course requirements that include diversity, equity, inclusion, 8 and critical race theory-related content. The board in its 9 discretion shall direct an institution to eliminate such a 10 course or course requirement. 11 Sec. 2. ESTABLISHMENT OF POLICIES ââ DATE. The board of 12 regents shall establish all policies required by this Act no 13 later than December 31, 2026. 14